Tennessee, session 114, SB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-1301(b), is amended by
deleting the language "state-owned office buildings" and substituting "state-owned or leased
office buildings".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1612
009154
- 1 -